Utah statutes.
17D-3-311.   Training for board members.

(1)  A member of a board of supervisors shall, within one year after taking office, complete the training described in Subsection (2).

(2)  The state auditor shall, with the assistance of the commission and an association that represents conservation districts, develop a training curriculum for a member of the board of supervisors and conduct the training.

